trunk/apertium-eo-ca/apertium-eo-ca.eo.dix
<pardef n="ambaŭ__det">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="quant__det">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="det"/><s n="qnt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="ser__vb">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="fts"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intan</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>intajn</l>    <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ontaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vbser"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="i__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>os</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itan</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>itajn</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ontaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inta</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>intaj</l>     <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ante</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inte</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="gerpast"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>as</l>        <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ita</l>       <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>itaj</l>      <r>i<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ite</l>       <r>i<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



<pardef n="Barcelona__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<pardef n="Barcelono__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Barcelon/o__np">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Balearoj__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="loc"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>


<!--
<pardef n="Maria__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="Mark/o__np">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
-->


<pardef n="Mark/o__np">
        <!-- el género y el número de momento resultan necesarios para la generación -->
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<!-- se la kazo mankas -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Mari/o__np">
        <!-- el género y el número de momento resultan necesarios para la generación -->
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
<!-- se la kazo mankas -->
  <e r="RL"><p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Maria__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><!-- se la kazo mankas -->
<p><l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ambaŭ">           <i>ambaŭ</i><par n="ambaŭ__det"/></e>
<e lm="Apalaĉoj">        <i>Apalaĉoj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="aperi">           <i>aper</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="Bahamoj">         <i>Bahamoj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Belizo">          <i>Beliz</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Bermudoj">        <i>Bermudoj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="datiĝi">          <i>datiĝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ekzisti">         <i>ekzist</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="enfakigi">        <i>enfakig</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esti">            <i>est</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="EU">              <i>EU</i><par n="Barcelono__np"/></e>
<e lm="fariĝi">          <i>fariĝ</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="Filipo">          <i>Filip</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Fiĝioj">          <i>Fiĝioj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Franclingvio">    <i>Franclingvi</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="grupiĝi">         <i>grupiĝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Jesuo">           <i>Jesu</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kanarioj">        <i>Kanarioj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Kanbero">         <i>Kanber</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="kelka">           <i>kelka</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="konstrui">        <i>konstru</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="Kristo">          <i>Krist</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="kutime esti">     <i>kutime<b/>est</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="Lutero">          <i>Luter</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="malmulta">        <i>malmulta</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="malplia">         <i>malplia</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="Malto">           <i>Malt</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Malvinoj">        <i>Malvinoj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="manki">           <i>mank</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="masaĝi">          <i>masaĝ</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="multa">           <i>multa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="Napoleono">       <i>Napoleon</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Neĝulino">        <i>Neĝulin</i><par n="Mari/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Noĥĉio">          <i>Noĥĉi</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Pitagoro">        <i>Pitagor</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="pledi">           <i>pled</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="plia">            <i>plia</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="reaperi">         <i>reaper</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="reveni al">       <i>reven</i><par n="i__vblex"/><p><l><b/>al</l><r><g><b/>al</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="Sejŝeloj">        <i>Sejŝeloj</i><par n="Balearoj__np"/></e>
<e lm="Skandinavio">     <i>Skandinavi</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="subtaksi">        <i>subtaks</i><par n="i__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sufiĉa">          <i>sufiĉa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="Tezeo">           <i>Teze</i><par n="Mark/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="tioma">           <i>tioma</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="troa">            <i>troa</i><par n="quant__det"/></e>
<e lm="veni">            <i>ven</i><par n="ser__vb"/></e>
<e lm="Vikipedio">       <i>Vikipedi</i><par n="Mari/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Zimbabvo">        <i>Zimbabv</i><par n="Barcelon/o__np"/></e>
<e lm="Queralt">           <i>Queralt</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Carolina">           <i>Carolina</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hafsa">           <i>Hafsa</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Hannah">           <i>Hannah</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Melany">           <i>Melany</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Rihanna">           <i>Rihanna</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Esrae">           <i>Esrae</i><par n="Maria__np"/></e>
<e lm="Seseña">         <i>Seseña</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Las Tres Villas">         <i>Las Tres Villas</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Loeches">         <i>Loeches</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Abades">         <i>Abades</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Moncalvillo">         <i>Moncalvillo</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Portilla">         <i>Portilla</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
<e lm="Moguer">         <i>Moguer</i><par n="Barcelona__np"/></e>
